Hawaii statutes.
[§356D-154] Relationship of annual payment
to rental and income. The amount of the annual payment with respect to any
dwelling unit shall not exceed the amount by which the fair market rental for
that unit exceeds thirty per cent of the tenant's income as determined by the
authority pursuant to procedures and rules pursuant to chapter 91. [L 2006, c
180, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next